Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Article 3. Spendthrifts

§ 2681.
Spendthrift, defined.

The word “spendthrift” shall be held to include every person who is liable to be put under guardianship on account of excessive drinking, gambling, idleness, or debauchery.

§ 2682.
Repealed. 2005, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 140(3).

§ 2683.
Repealed.
1979, No. 76, § 20.

§ 2684.
Spendthrift; hearing; notice.

When a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian under section 2682 of this title, the Probate Division of the Superior Court shall schedule a hearing and notice shall be given as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 16;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 124;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2685.
Decree; appeal.

On hearing the parties interested, the court shall make decree in the premises as appears just.
The person complained of may appeal from such decree without giving bond, but during the pendency thereof, the person so appointed shall act as guardian.

§ 2686.
Repealed.
1979, No. 76, § 20.

§ 2687.
Expense of resisting application.

When the Probate Division of the Superior Court appoints a guardian for a spendthrift or a mentally disabled person, it may allow for the expenses of the ward in defending against the petition such sum out of the ward’s estate as appears to be reasonable.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 4;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2688.
Repealed.
1967, No. 147, § 53(b), eff. Oct. 1, 1968.

§ 2689.
Repealed. 2005, No. 174 (Adj. Sess.), § 140(3).

§ 2690.
Guardian to give notice that ward’s contracts and transfers will be void.

As soon as possible after appointment, the guardian of a spendthrift shall give notice of the appointment as provided by the Rules of Probate Procedure and shall give similar notice that contracts made by the ward will be held void. Contracts, gifts, sales, or transfers of real or personal estate made by the ward after the date of appointment of the guardian shall be void.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 18;

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 126.

§ 2691.
Spouse to support and have custody.

The appointment of a guardian for a person who is married shall not relieve the ward’s spouse from liability to support the spouse, nor shall it deprive the spouse of the custody of the ward provided the spouse is suitable and competent to care for the ward.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 5.

§ 2692.
Extent of guardian’s control.

Until they are legally discharged, guardians of spendthrifts shall have the possession and management of the estates of their wards.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 76

, § 19.

§ 2693.
Married woman may be guardian.

A married woman may be appointed guardian of her husband or of any other person under the provisions of this chapter and, when so appointed, shall have the same rights, powers, and privileges and be subject to the same liabilities as if she were unmarried.

§ 2694.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.